District of Columbia statutes.
23-311

Joinder of offenses and of defendants.

(a)

Two or more offenses may be charged in the same indictment or information in a separate count for each offense if the offenses charged, whether felonies or misdemeanors or both, are of the same or similar character or are based on the same act or transaction or on two or more acts or transactions connected together or constituting parts of a common scheme or plan.

(b)

Two or more offenses may be charged in the same indictment or information as provided in subsection (a) even though one or more is in violation of the laws of the United States and another is in violation of the laws applicable exclusively to the District of Columbia and may be prosecuted as provided in section 11-502(3).

(c)

Two or more defendants may be charged in the same indictment or information if they are alleged to have participated in the same act or transaction or in the same series of acts or transactions constituting an offense or offenses. Such defendants may be charged in one or more counts together or separately and all of the defendants need not be charged in each count.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Cross References

Aggregation of theft, fraud, and credit card fraud offenses, see § 22-3202.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-311.
1973 Ed., § 23-311.